da: Understøttede lysstyringsprotokoller: Art-Net; DMX512; Kling-Net; MIDI; OSC; RDM; sACN (E1.31); Andet
nb: Støttede lyskontrollprotokoller: Art-Net; DMX512; Kling-Net; MIDI; OSC; RDM; sACN (E1.31); Annet
sv: Protokoll för belysningskontroll som stöds: Art-Net; DMX512; Kling-Net; MIDI; OSC; RDM; sACN (E1.31); Övrigt
de: Unterstützte Lichtsteuerungsprotokolle: Art-Net; DMX512; Kling-Net; MIDI; OSC; RDM; sACN (E1.31); Sonstige
en: Lighting control protocols supported: Art-Net; DMX512; Kling-Net; MIDI; OSC; RDM; sACN (E1.31); Other
th: รองรับโปรโตคอลควบคุมแสงสว่าง: Art-Net; DMX512; Kling-Net; MIDI; OSC; RDM; sACN (E1.31); อื่นๆ
tr: Desteklenen aydınlatma kontrol protokolleri: Art-Net; DMX512; Kling-Net; MIDI; OSC; RDM; sACN (E1.31); Diğer
cs: Podporované protokoly pro řízení osvětlení: Art-Net; DMX512; Kling-Net; MIDI; OSC; RDM; sACN (E1.31); Jiné
es: Protocolos de control de iluminación compatibles: Art-Net; DMX512; Kling-Net; MIDI; OSC; RDM; sACN (E1.31); Otro
pt-PT: Protocolos de controlo de iluminação suportados: Art-Net; DMX512; Kling-Net; MIDI; OSC; RDM; sACN (E1.31); Outro
sl-SI: Podprti protokoli za upravljanje razsvetljave: Art-Net; DMX512; Kling-Net; MIDI; OSC; RDM; sACN (E1.31); Drugo
hu: Támogatott világításvezérlési protokollok: Art-Net; DMX512; Kling-Net; MIDI; OSC; RDM; sACN (E1.31); Egyéb
ko: 지원되는 조명 제어 프로토콜: Art-Net; DMX512; Kling-Net; MIDI; OSC; RDM; sACN(E1.31); 기타
lt-LT: Palaikomi apšvietimo valdymo protokolai: Art-Net; DMX512; Kling-Net; MIDI; OSC; RDM; sACN (E1.31); Kita
sk-SK: Podporované protokoly ovládania svetiel: Art-Net; DMX512; Kling-Net; MIDI; OSC; RDM; sACN (E1.31); Iné
zh-CN: 支持的照明控制协议: Art-Net; DMX512; Kling-Net; MIDI; OSC; RDM; sACN (E1.31); 其他
ro-RO: Protocoale de control al iluminatului acceptate: Art-Net; DMX512; Kling-Net; MIDI; OSC; RDM; sACN (E1.31); Altele
el: Υποστηριζόμενα πρωτόκολλα ελέγχου φωτισμού: Art-Net; DMX512; Kling-Net; MIDI; OSC; RDM; sACN (E1.31); Άλλο
it: Protocolli di controllo dell'illuminazione supportati: Art-Net; DMX512; Kling-Net; MIDI; OSC; RDM; sACN (E1.31); Altro
fi: Tuetut valaistuksen ohjausprotokollat: Art-Net; DMX512; Kling-Net; MIDI; OSC; RDM; sACN (E1.31); Muu
ja: 照明制御プロトコルに対応: Art-Net; DMX512; Kling-Net; MIDI; OSC; RDM; sACN (E1.31); その他
ru: Поддерживаемые протоколы управления освещением: Art-Net; DMX512; Kling-Net; MIDI; OSC; RDM; sACN (E1.31); Другое
nl: Lichtregeling ondersteunde protocollen: Art-Net; DMX512; Kling-Net; MIDI; OSC; RDM; sACN (E1.31); Overige
hr-HR: Podržani protokoli za upravljanje rasvjetom: Art-Net; DMX512; Kling-Net; MIDI; OSC; RDM; sACN (E1.31); Ostalo
vi: Các giao thức điều khiển ánh sáng được hỗ trợ: Art-Net; DMX512; Kling-Net; MIDI; OSC; RDM; sACN (E1.31); Khác
pl: Obsługiwane protokoły sterowania oświetleniem: Art-Net; DMX512; Kling-Net; MIDI; OSC; RDM; sACN (E1.31); Inne
pt-BR: Iluminação protocolos de controle suportados: Art-Net; DMX512; Kling-Net; MIDI; OSC; RDM; sACN (E1.31); Outro
fr: Protocoles de commande d’éclairage pris en charge: Art-Net; DMX512; Kling-Net; MIDI; OSC; RDM; sACN (E1.31); Autre
bg-BG: Поддържани протоколи за управление на осветлението: Art-Net; DMX512; Kling-Net; MIDI; OSC; RDM; sACN (E1.31); Друго
zh-TW: 支援的照明控制協定: Art-Net; DMX512; Kling-Net; MIDI; OSC; RDM; sACN (E1.31); 其他